Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Kentucky Sports Authority

148.590.
Kentucky Sports Authority — Membership — Chairperson — Executive director — Functions. [Repealed]

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 10, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 16, § 24, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 138, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 44, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 70, § 22, effective June 29, 2017; repealed by 2018 ch. 124, § 5, effective July 14, 2018.